Georgia, session 2025_26, HB140.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
This Act shall be known and may be cited as the "End Local Taxation by Citation Act."
SECTION 2.
Article 1 of Chapter 81 of Title 36 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
local government budgets and audits, is amended by revising Code Section 36-81-10, relating
to effect of article on right to make expenditures and raise revenue, and effect on home rule
powers, as follows:
H. B. 140
- 1 -

LC 47 3180
"36-81-10.
Except as provided for in Code Section 36-81-12, this This article shall not be construed
so as to prohibit local governments from making authorized expenditures for any lawful
purpose or from raising revenues in any manner otherwise authorized by law. It is the
specific intent of the General Assembly in adopting this article that, except as provided for
in Code Section 36-81-12, local units of government shall continue to have and to exercise
their home rule powers as provided by law."
SECTION 3.
Said article is further amended by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
"36-81-12.
(a) No more than 10 percent of the funds appropriated in a local government's budget
ordinance shall be derived from funds collected by such local government as criminal or
civil fines or as a result of a criminal or civil forfeiture action.
(b) Any funds received by a local government as criminal or civil fines or as a result of a
criminal or civil forfeiture action in excess of the amount provided for in subsection (a) of
this Code section shall escheat to the state at the conclusion of the local government's fiscal
year. Within 30 days of the end of a local government's fiscal year, such escheated funds
shall be transmitted to the Office of the State Treasurer for deposit in the general fund of
this state.
(c) This Code section shall apply to any budget ordinance adopted by a local government
for any fiscal year beginning on or after January 1, 2026."
SECTION 4.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 140
- 2 -